Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-19,118
Application of other laws.

A title insurance agent shall be subject to all other applicable provisions of the insurance laws of this state unless specifically addressed by the Title Insurance Agent Act.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 41.